Utah statutes.
4-30-5.   Hearing on license application -- Notice of hearing.
(1)  Upon the filing of an application, the chairman of the Livestock Market
Committee shall set a time for hearing on the application in the city or town
nearest the proposed site of the livestock market and cause notice of the time
and place of the hearing together with a copy of the application to be
forwarded by mail, not less than 15 days before the hearing date, to the
following:
(a)  each licensed livestock market operator within the state; and
(b)  each livestock or other interested association or group of persons in the
state that has filed written notice with the committee requesting receipt of
notice of such hearings.
(2)  Notice of the hearing shall be published 14 days before the scheduled
hearing date:
(a)  in a daily or weekly newspaper of general circulation within the city or
town where the hearing is scheduled; and
(b)  on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701.
